Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3523
Board; meetings; quorum.

The board shall hold at least one regular meeting each year. Special meetings shall be held as provided in the rules and regulations and at such places as the board elects. Notice of all meetings shall be given in such manner as provided in the rules and regulations. The board shall elect annually at its first meeting after March 1, from its members, a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary. A quorum of the board shall consist of not less than five members.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 71.